Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
PART 2
RODENTS AND PREDATORY ANIMALS

35-7-201. Control and eradication of rodents.

The boards of county commissioners of the several counties of this state are authorized to purchase materials and equipment and to employ one or more suitable persons to destroy jackrabbits, prairie dogs, ground squirrels, or other injurious rodents within the limits of their respective counties. Any materials and equipment so purchased and compensation for such services shall be paid out of the general fund or a specially designated fund of such county.

The boards of county commissioners of the several counties of this state are authorized to levy such taxes as are necessary to pay the obligations for rodent control work as authorized under this section and to put into operation any plan of procedure for the eradication of such rodent pests within their jurisdictions as in their discretion is deemed advisable; except that control operations under the provisions of this section shall be in accordance with the approved procedure of the federal agency. The boards of county commissioners may solicit cooperation from the state board of stock inspection commissioners and the federal agency for the conduct of such rodent control work and may enter into cooperative agreements with the board of stock inspection commissioners and the federal agency for the furtherance of the rodent control work authorized under this section.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 1073, §§ 1, 2.

CSA:

C. 45, § 38(1).

CRS 53:

§ 36-13-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-13-1.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1031, § 64, effective June 1.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (HB 11-1087), ch. 19, p. 49, § 5, effective August 10.

35-7-202. Control and eradication of predatory animals.

The boards of county commissioners of the several counties of the state are authorized to purchase materials and equipment and to employ one or more suitable persons to control coyotes or other injurious predatory animals within the limits of their respective counties. Any materials and equipment so purchased and compensation for such services shall be paid out of the general fund or a specially designated fund of such county.

The boards of county commissioners of the several counties of the state are authorized to levy such taxes as are necessary to pay the obligations for such predatory animal control work as authorized by this section and to put into operation any plan of procedure for the eradication of such predatory animals within their jurisdictions as in their discretion is deemed advisable.

Control operations under the provisions of this section shall be in accordance with the approved procedure of the federal agency. The boards of county commissioners may solicit cooperation from the state board of stock inspection commissioners and the federal agency for the conduct of such predatory animal control work and may enter into cooperative agreements with the state board of stock inspection commissioners and the federal agency for the furtherance of the predatory animal control work authorized under this section.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 369, §§ 1, 2.

CSA:

C. 45, § 38(2).

CRS 53:

§ 36-13-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-13-2.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 1395, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 1031, § 65, effective June 1.

Cross references:

For control of predatory animals generally, see article 40 of this title 35.

35-7-203. Release of destructive rodent pests - definitions.

No person shall release destructive rodent pests into a county unless the person complies with all requirements for such release imposed by the parks and wildlife commission and obtains both the prior approval of the commission and the prior approval, by resolution duly adopted, of the board of county commissioners of such county. A person need not obtain such prior approval before:

Transporting destructive rodent pests through a county without releasing such destructive rodent pests; or

Confining destructive rodent pests indoors or in cages or similar enclosures and using such destructive rodent pests for scientific purposes or as food for human or animal consumption; or

Keeping destructive rodent pests indoors or in cages or similar enclosures as pets; or

Releasing destructive rodent pests into the county in which such destructive rodent pests were originally taken into captivity.

For purposes of this section, "destructive rodent pests" means one or more rodents, including but not limited to prairie dogs, ground squirrels, pocket gophers, jackrabbits, and rats, that pose a threat to agricultural, horticultural, or livestock concerns or to human health.

The board of county commissioners of any county into which a person releases destructive rodent pests without the prior approval of such board may, at its discretion:

Require the person who released the destructive rodent pests to eradicate the destructive rodent pests or remove the destructive rodent pests from the county; or

Impose a fine upon the person who released the destructive rodent pests in an amount sufficient to compensate the county for the cost of eradicating the destructive rodent pests or removing the destructive rodent pests from the county.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 155, § 1, effective March 25.

L. 2012:

IP(1) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1236, § 93, effective June 4.

Cross references:

For the parks and wildlife commission, see § 33-9-101.